Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 2

Local Enterprise Zone Act

13-28-201. Short title.

This part shall be known as the “Local Enterprise Zone Act.”

Acts 1989, ch. 541, § 1.

13-28-202. Authorization and establishment of program.

There is hereby authorized and established a program for the selection, designation, and management of enterprise zones within appropriate communities in this state.

Acts 1989, ch. 541, § 2.

13-28-203. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the local enterprise zone management board appointed by a municipality;

“Enterprise zone” means an area declared by the board to be eligible for the benefits of this part;

“Municipality” means an incorporated city which has adopted home rule or county which has adopted a metropolitan form of government in accordance with the Constitution of Tennessee, art. XI, § 9, and any county which has adopted a charter form of government pursuant to the Constitution of Tennessee and title 5, chapter 1, part 2;

“Qualified business” means any person, corporation or other entity engaged in the active conduct of a trade or business within a designated enterprise zone, except that for chain stores or other businesses or industries with multiple locations, only those locations or operations within the zone shall be considered as qualified businesses; and

“Qualified property” means:

Any tangible personal property which is used predominately by the taxpayer in an enterprise zone in the active conduct of a trade or business;

Any real property located in such a zone which is used predominately by the taxpayer for residential purposes or in the active conduct of a trade or business, or is sold or exchanged by an individual whose principal residence is in such a zone; or

Any interest in a corporation, partnership, or other entity if, for the most recent taxable year of such entity ending before the date of the sale or exchange, such entity was a qualified business.

Acts 1989, ch. 541, § 3.

13-28-204. Local ordinance or resolution — Enterprise zone management board.

Each municipality is authorized to create and appoint by ordinance or resolution an enterprise zone management board. The ordinance or resolution shall designate the number and qualification of board members, establish the terms of office of such board members and provide for the appointment of members and administration of such board. No such ordinance or resolution shall take effect unless it is approved by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative body of the municipality at two (2) consecutive, regularly scheduled meetings.

Acts 1989, ch. 541, § 4.

13-28-205. Board — Powers and duties.

The board shall administer this part and has the following powers and duties:

Declare as “enterprise zones” areas for which the municipality has submitted documentation to the board, in the form of an application for designation;

Recommend suspension of local regulations within the zone or zones not specifically suspended by this part, when the board determines such suspension to be appropriate;

Provide individuals who meet the criteria of this part with enterprise zone residency certificates, which individuals can use for the benefits of this part, and which businesses can use to verify that they have met the requirements to qualify as “qualified businesses”;

Monitor the implementation and operation of this part;

Assist the municipality in obtaining demonstration project status and assistance from the state or federal government, including the suspension of state and federal regulations within the enterprise zones;

Submit reports evaluating the effectiveness of the program and any suggestions for local regulation changes to the municipality or suggestions for state regulation changes to the governor and the general assembly by January 1 of each year; and

Promulgate necessary rules and regulations and to prescribe procedures to effectuate the purposes of this part.

Acts 1989, ch. 541, § 5.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

13-28-206. Criteria for depressed areas — Application.

Depressed areas proposed to be designated as “enterprise zones” by the municipality shall meet the following criteria:

The area is within the jurisdiction of the municipality;

The boundary of the area is contiguous and includes, if feasible, vacant or underutilized lands or buildings which are conveniently accessible to area residents;

If the area is located in a metropolitan statistical area with a population of fifty thousand (50,000) or greater, the population of the area shall be at least four thousand (4,000); if the area is not located in a metropolitan statistical area, the population of the area shall be one thousand (1,000) or more as determined under the most recent census;

The area shall be in a jurisdiction or “pocket of poverty” that is urban development action grant (UDAG) eligible; and

The area shall be one of pervasive poverty, unemployment and general distress, and have:

An average rate of unemployment in such areas for the most recent twenty-four-month period for which data is available of at least one and one-half (1½) times the average national rate of unemployment for such twenty-four-month period;

A poverty rate of at least twenty percent (20%) or more in all census tracts;

At least seventy percent (70%) of the households in the area with incomes below eighty percent (80%) of the median income of the households of the government designating such area; or

A total population decrease of at least twenty percent (20%) during the period between the last two (2) decennial censuses.

Any municipality may designate any area meeting the criteria of subsection (a) within its jurisdiction as a depressed area. Such municipality may then make written application to the board to have such area or areas declared to be an enterprise zone. Such application shall include a description of the location of the area or areas in question and such other information as the board may require to satisfy itself that the criteria of subsection (a) have been met. Such municipality shall hold at least one (1) public hearing in the proposed zone at least thirty (30) days prior to the preparation of the application, and residents of the proposed zone shall be actively involved in the preparation of the application.

The written application submitted by the municipality should indicate the community's willingness to assume the duty and responsibility to:

Devise and implement a program to improve public safety within the enterprise zone;

Give priority to the use of community development block grant (CDBG) funds, urban development action grant (UDAG) funds, and local capital improvement funds within an enterprise zone;

Assist the board in certifying employers to be eligible for the benefits of this part;

Study and consider the desirability of amending or repealing certain local regulations and ordinances which might be impeding growth and development;

Assist the board in evaluating progress made in any enterprise zone within its jurisdiction; and

Make appropriate local tax or other regulatory concessions which are not in violation of constitutional requirements.

Nothing contained within this part shall be construed to authorize a municipality to offer or make concessions pertaining to county taxes or regulations. Likewise, nothing contained within this part shall be construed to authorize a county to offer or make concessions pertaining to municipal taxes or regulations.

Acts 1989, ch. 541, § 6.

13-28-207. Application — Review — Removal of designation.

Upon receipt of an application from the municipality, the board shall review such application and secure any additional information it deems necessary for the purpose of determining whether the area or areas described in the application qualify to be declared an enterprise zone.

The board shall complete its review within ninety (90) days of receipt of the application, but it may extend this time period an additional thirty (30) days if necessary. If the application meets the established criteria, then the board shall declare the designated area to be an enterprise zone. If the application does not meet the criteria, then the board shall deny the application and inform the municipality of that fact, together with a description of the reasons the application failed to meet the criteria. If the board fails to render a decision within the required time period, the application shall be automatically approved.

The board may remove designation of any area as an enterprise zone if such area no longer meets the criteria for designation as set out in this part; provided, that no designation shall be removed less than ten (10) years from the date of original designation unless there are no beneficiaries or qualified businesses remaining in the zone.

Acts 1989, ch. 541, § 7.

13-28-208. Enterprise zone development corporations — Funding — Employment.

Communities which succeed in establishing designated enterprise zones shall be empowered to set up nonprofit enterprise zone development corporations with the agreement of affected governmental entities under existing state legislation (industrial development corporations, compiled in title 7, chapter 53) which empowers such corporations to take title or own, acquire or manage real property, to solicit and accept grants and contributions from any source, and to make loans and grants in accordance with this part.

In addition to establishing such corporations in accordance with title 7, chapter 53, the enterprise zone development corporations shall be composed as follows:

One half (½) of the members shall be selected at-large;

One fourth (¼) of the members shall be selected from residents of the proposed zone; and

One fourth (¼) of the members shall be selected from managers or operators of businesses located within the proposed zone.

The enterprise zone development corporation shall not be vested with the power of eminent domain. The enterprise zone development corporation shall not have the authority to issue bonds.

A minimum of ten percent (10%) of the allocation of funds for low interest loans administered by local government will be set aside for use of qualified residents/owners in the enterprise zone subject to an annual review.

A qualified business in an enterprise zone shall employ at least thirty percent (30%) of qualified zone residents meeting the requirements of new jobs created by such business.

Acts 1989, ch. 541, § 8.

13-28-209. Incentives and exemptions for qualified businesses or residents.

The ordinance or resolution to implement this part shall provide for such incentives and exemptions and the manner in which such incentives and exemptions shall be offered for qualified businesses as in the discretion of the municipality are deemed to be desirable and in the best interest of the welfare of the community as a whole. The ordinance or resolution may provide for state participation in providing incentives or exemptions to qualified businesses or qualified zone residents in the enterprise zone.

Acts 1989, ch. 541, § 9.

13-28-210. Regulatory exemptions of enterprise zones.

To carry out the purposes of this part, any agency, as defined by § 4-5-102, which promulgates rules, as defined by § 4-5-102, or any administrative body of the municipality which promulgates regulations pursuant to appropriate legal authority, may, by rule or regulation, exempt designated enterprise zones from any rule or regulation, in whole or in part, promulgated by such agency or by such administrative body as provided in the ordinance or resolution.

An enterprise zone is not exempt from any rule or regulation if the exemption endangers the health and safety of the citizens of the state.

The board shall conduct a review of all rules promulgated, and shall recommend to the municipality the exemption of rules promulgated which would contribute to the implementation of this part.

Any exemption of a regulation by an administrative body of the municipality shall be promulgated as a subsequent regulation in accordance with the law authorizing promulgation of the regulation proposed for exemption within designated zones.

Acts 1989, ch. 541, § 10.

13-28-211. Issuance of permission required by law — Agency authority.

Notwithstanding the authority delegated to the board to implement this part, the authority for issuing licenses, permits, certificates, approvals, registrations, charters, or any other form of permission required by law shall remain with the agency otherwise legally authorized to issue such form of permission.

Acts 1989, ch. 541, § 11.